tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Parçaları > Motorlu Taşıt Lambaları: Sis Farları; Farlar; Işık Çubukları; Ampuller; Işık Kapakları; Aydınlatma Anahtarları; Arka Lambalar; Dönüş Sinyalleri
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Parts > Motor Vehicle Lighting: Fog Lights; Headlights; Light Bars; Light Bulbs; Light Covers; Light Switches; Tail Lights; Turn Signals
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen osat > Moottoriajoneuvojen valot: Sumuvalot; Ajovalot; Valopalkit; Polttimot; Valosuojat; Valokatkaisijat; Perävalot; Suuntavilkut
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 自動車・バイク用パーツ > 自動車・バイク用ライト: フォグランプ; ヘッドライト; ライトバー; 電球; ライトカバー; 照明用スイッチ; テールランプ; 方向指示器
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนรถยนต์ > ไฟรถยนต์: ไฟตัดหมอก; ไฟหน้า; แถบไฟ; หลอดไฟ; ฝาครอบไฟ; สวิตช์ไฟ; ไฟท้าย; สัญญาณไฟเลี้ยว
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车零部件 > 汽车照明系统: 雾灯; 车头灯; 灯条; 电灯泡; 灯盖; 照明开关; 尾灯; 转向灯
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Motorvoertuigonderdelen > Verlichting voor motorvoertuigen: Mistlichten; Koplampen; Lichtbalken; Lichtbronnen; Lichthoezen; Lichtschakelaars; Achterlichten; Richtingaanwijzers
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Iluminação para veículos motorizados: Luzes de nevoeiro; Faróis; Barras de iluminação; Lâmpadas; Coberturas de luz; Interruptores de iluminação; Luzes traseiras; Pisca-pisca
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi za motorna vozila > Rasvjeta za motorna vozila: Maglenke; Prednja svjetla; Svjetlosne trake; Žarulje; Zaštite za svjetla; Prekidači za svjetlo; Stražnja svjetla; Pokazivači smjera
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Componenti per veicoli a motore > Illuminazione per veicoli a motore: Fendinebbia; Fari; Barre luminose; Lampadine; Coperture leggere; Interruttori della luce; Luci posteriori; Indicatori di direzione
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части за моторни превозни средства > Осветление на моторни превозни средства: Фарове за мъгла; Фарове; Лампи; Крушки за светлини; Протектори за фарове; Ключове за осветление; Задни светлини; Мигачи
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly motorových vozidel > Osvětlení motorových vozidel: Mlhová světla; Přední světlomety; Světelné rampy; Žárovky a svítivky; Kryty na světla; Vypínače osvětlení; Koncová světla; Směrová světla (blinkry)
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Φωτισμός οχημάτων: Φώτα ομίχλης; Εμπρόσθια φώτα; Μπάρες φωτισμού; Λαμπτήρες φωτισμού; Καλύμματα φωτιστικών; Διακόπτες φωτισμού; Οπίσθια φώτα; Φλας
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonsdelar > Lampor till motorfordon: Dimljus; Strålkastare; Ljusstänger; Glödlampor; Ljusskydd; Strömbrytare; Bakljus; Blinkers
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøydeler > Kjøretøybelysning: Tåkelys; Frontlykter; Lysstenger; Lyspærer; Lysdeksler; Lysbrytere; Baklykter; Blinklys
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių dalys > Motorinių transporto priemonių apšvietimas: Rūko žibintai; Priekiniai žibintai; Šviesos juostos; Lemputės; Žibintų dangteliai; Šviesos jungikliai; Galiniai žibintai; Posūkio signalai
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車零配件 > 機動車輛照明裝置: 霧燈; 車頭燈; 燈條; 燈泡; 車燈罩; 電燈開關; 尾燈; 方向燈
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées automobiles et motos > Éclairage de véhicule: Feux de brouillard; Phares; Barres lumineuses; Ampoules; Protection des phares; Interrupteurs; Feux arrières; Clignotants
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjárműalkatrészek > Gépjármű-világítás: Ködlámpák; Fényszórók; Fénysávok; Izzók; Fényburkolatok; Fénykapcsolók; Hátsó lámpák; Irányjelzők
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Luzes veiculares: Faróis de nevoeiro; Faróis; Barras de luz; Lâmpadas; Tampas de farol; Interruptores de luz; Luzes traseiras; Luzes de mudança de direção
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Piezas para vehículos motorizados > Luces para vehículos motorizados: Faros antiniebla; Faros; Barras de luz; Bombillas; Cubiertas de luz; Interruptores de luz; Luces traseras; Intermitentes
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Teile > Kfz-Beleuchtung: Nebelscheinwerfer; Scheinwerfer; Light-Bars; Leuchtmittel; Lichtabdeckung; Lichtschalter; Rückleuchten; Blinker
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Phụ tùng xe cơ giới > Đèn xe cơ giới: Đèn sương mù; Đèn pha; Thanh ánh sáng; Bóng đèn; Vỏ đèn; Công tắc đèn; Đèn đuôi; Đèn xi nhan
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części do pojazdów silnikowych > Oświetlenie samochodowe: Światła przeciwmgielne; Światła drogowe; Listwy świetlne; Żarówki; Osłony świateł; Włączniki światła; Światła tylne; Kierunkowskazy
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 부품 > 자동차 조명: 안개등; 헤드라이트; 라이트 바; 전구; 라이트 커버; 전등 스위치; 후미등; 방향 지시등
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильные запчасти > Автомобильная светотехника: Противотуманные фары; Фары головного света; Световые балки; Лампочки; Накладки на фары; Переключатели света фар; Задние габаритные огни; Указатели поворотов
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely motorových vozidiel > Svetlá motorových vozidiel: Hmlovky; Svetlomety; Svetelné rampy; Žiarovky; Kryty svetlometov; Spínače svetlometov; Zadné svetlá; Smerovky
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele til motorkøretøjer > Lygter til motorkøretøjer: Tågelygter; Forlygter; Lysstænger; Elpærer; Lysdæksler; Lyskontakter; Baglygter; Blinklys
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli za motorna vozila > Razsvetljava za motorna vozila: Meglenke; Žarometi; Svetlobne letve; Sijalke; Pokrovi za luči; Stikala za luči; Zadnje luči; Smerniki
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese autovehicule > Iluminat autovehicul: Faruri de ceață; Faruri; Bare luminoase; Becuri; Capace faruri; Întrerupătoare lumină; Faruri spate; Lămpi semnalizare